Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska21-1913
Secretary of State; powers.

The Secretary of State has the power reasonably necessary to perform the duties required of his or her office by the Nebraska Nonprofit Corporation Act.

Laws 1996, LB 681, § 13.